Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,127
Discretionary powers; how construed.

Nothing contained in the Nebraska Housing Agency Act shall create, expressly or by implication, any right, claim, or cause of action in favor of anyone in connection with any failure of a housing agency to exercise any one or more of its discretionary powers.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 56.